South Dakota, session 2026, SB45.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 34-20B-117 be AMENDED:
34-20B-117. The following actions are unlawful:
(1) To knowingly sell or distribute a product intended for human consumption
containing delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinolic acid, THC-
O acetate, or hexahydrocannabinol to a person under the age of twenty-one, unless
the substance was obtained directly or pursuant to a valid prescription or order
from a practitioner, acting in the course of the practitioner's professional practice;
(2) The purchase or attempt to purchase, the receipt or attempt to receive, the
possession, or the consumption of, a product intended for human consumption
containing delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinolic acid, THC-
O acetate, or hexahydrocannabinol by a person under the age of twenty-one,
unless the substance was obtained directly or pursuant to a valid prescription or
order from a practitioner, acting in the course of the practitioner's professional
practice; and
(3) To purchase a product intended for human consumption containing delta-8
tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinolic acid, THC-O acetate, or
hexahydrocannabinol on behalf of, or to give a product intended for human
consumption containing delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9
tetrahydrocannabinolic acid, THC-O acetate, or hexahydrocannabinol to, any
person under the age of twenty-one, unless:
(a) The purchaser is a parent or guardian of the person under the age of
twenty-one; and

26.460.12 2 45
(b) The substance was obtained directly or pursuant to a valid prescription or
order from a practitioner, acting in the course of the practitioner's
professional practice.
A violation of subdivision (1) is a Class 1 misdemeanor. A violation of subdivision
(2) or (3) is a Class 2 misdemeanor.
SB45 ENROLLED

26.460.12 3 45
An Act to revise a provision regulating delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol, THC-O acetate, and
hexahydrocannabinol for persons under the age of twenty-one and to provide a penalty
therefor.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 45
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 45 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB45 ENROLLED